Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 6. Municipal Gas Authority of Mississippi Law
§ 77-6-31.
Revenue bonds; powers and duties.

Each municipality and the authority are hereby authorized to issue at one (1) time or from time to time revenue bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any of the purposes authorized by this chapter. The principal of, premium, if any, and the interest on such bonds shall be payable solely from the respective funds herein provided for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the issuer, provided that the bonds of any issue shall not bear a greater overall interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972. The bonds of each issue shall be dated and shall mature in such amounts and at such time or times, either as serial bonds or term bonds or a combination of serial and term bonds, not exceeding fifty (50) years from their respective date or dates, as may be determined by the governing board of the issuer, and may be made redeemable before maturity at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the governing board of the issuer prior to the issuance of the bonds. The governing board of the issuer shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bond, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. The governing board of the issuer may also provide for the authentication of the bonds by a trustee or fiscal agent. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in fully registered form, or both, as the governing board of the issuer may determine, and provisions may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest. All bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

All bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be advertised and sold on sealed bids in the manner provided under the provisions of Section 31-19-25; provided that on bond sales in excess of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) the authority may sell its bonds by negotiated sale at not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par, plus accrued interest, when the authority has employed a qualified financial advisor for the proposed bond issue. The duties of the financial advisor shall include the responsibility of preparing a statement to be submitted to the Governor, the Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee which shall clearly set forth the reasons why the negotiated sale was considered to be in the best interest of the authority and member municipalities, including the estimated savings in cost by selling the bonds at a negotiated sale.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the purposes for which such bonds have been issued, and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the governing board of the issuer may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds. The municipality or the authority may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The municipality or the authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall have become mutilated or shall have been destroyed or lost.

Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of the state or of any municipality, or of any agency, commission or instrumentality of either thereof, and without any other approvals, proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those approvals, proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this chapter and the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or the trust agreement securing the same; provided, however, the authority shall not issue any bonds pursuant to this chapter without the approval of sixty percent (60%) of its members.

All bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable in accordance with their terms and shall be “securities” within the meaning of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, subject only to provisions of the bonds pertaining to registration.

The state hereby covenants with the holders of any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter that so long as such bonds are outstanding and unpaid the state will not terminate the existence of nor limit or alter the rights and powers of a municipality or the authority under this chapter to conduct the activities referred to herein in any way pertinent to the interests of the bondholders, including, without limitation, the right to charge and collect rates, fees and charges and to fulfill the terms of any covenants made with bondholders, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders, unless provision for full payment of such bonds, by escrow or otherwise, has been made pursuant to the terms of the bonds or the resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument securing the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 16; Laws, 2002, ch. 381, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 2002).

§ 77-6-33.
Security for bonds.

In the discretion of the governing board of the issuer, any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a resolution, a trust indenture or other security instrument, and in this regard the issuer may enter into an agreement with any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state to act as trustee for such bonds. Such resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders.

The resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument providing for the issuance of such bonds may, in the discretion of the governing board of the issuer, contain covenants including, but not limited to, the following:

The pledge of all or any part of the revenues derived or to be derived from the project or projects to be financed by the bonds or from the gas system or facilities of a municipality or the authority.

The rents, rates, fees and charges to be established, maintained and collected, and the use and disposal of revenues, gifts, grants and funds received or to be received by the municipality or the authority.

The setting aside of reserves and the investment, regulation and disposition thereof.

The custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of all moneys held for the payment of bonds.

Limitations or restrictions on the purposes to which the proceeds of sale of bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied.

Limitations or restrictions on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, or the refunding of outstanding or other bonds.

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended, the percentage of bonds the bondholders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given.

Events of default and the rights and liabilities arising thereupon, the terms and conditions upon which bonds issued under this chapter shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

The preparation and maintenance of a budget.

The retention or employment of consulting engineers, independent auditors and other technical consultants.

Limitations on or the prohibition of free service to any person, firm or corporation, public or private.

The acquisition and disposal of property, provided that no project or part thereof shall be mortgaged by such resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument.

Provisions for insurance and for accounting reports and the inspection and audit thereof.

The continuing operation and maintenance of the project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-35.
Rents, rates, fees and charges by municipality.

A municipality is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for gas and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its gas system or its interest in any joint project. For so long as any bonds of a municipality are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its gas system, and its interest in any joint project, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution authorizing and securing bonds, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds heretofore or hereafter issued to finance additions, improvements and betterments to its gas system, and to pay any and all amounts which the municipality may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prohibit any municipality from expending any revenues in excess of that required herein in any manner otherwise permitted by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-37.
Rents, rates, fees and charges by authority.

The authority is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for gas and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its projects. For so long as any bonds of the authority are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, rates, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its projects and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution authorizing and securing bonds, and to pay any and all amounts which the authority may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-39.
Pledge of municipality or authority valid and binding when made.

Any pledge made by a municipality or the authority pursuant to this chapter shall be valid and binding from the date the pledge is made. The revenues, securities and other moneys so pledged and then held or thereafter received by the municipality or the authority or any fiduciary shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the municipality or the authority without regard to whether such parties have notice thereof. The resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument by which a pledge is created need not be filed or recorded in any manner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-41.
Investment of all monies received.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues may be temporarily invested and reinvested pending the disbursements thereof in such securities and other investments as may be permitted by law for investment of excess funds of municipalities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-43.
Rights of holders of bonds.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted hereunder, or, to the extent permitted by law, under such resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or under any agreement or other contract executed by the municipality or the authority pursuant to this chapter, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by such resolution to be performed by the authority or municipality or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging and collecting of rents, rates, fees and charges.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-45.
Bonds to be securities.

Bonds issued by a municipality or the authority under the provisions of Sections 77-6-29 through 77-6-57 are hereby made securities in which all public officers and agencies of the state and all political subdivisions, all insurance companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or agency of the state or any political subdivision for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state or any political subdivision is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-47.
Obligations of issuing municipality or authority.

The bonds shall be special obligations of the municipality or the authority issuing them. The principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the bonds shall not be payable from the general funds of the municipality or the authority, nor shall they constitute a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien or encumbrance upon any of its property or upon any of its income, receipts or revenues, except the funds which are pledged under the resolution authorizing the bonds. Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of a municipality or of the state are, or may be, pledged for the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds, and no holder of the bonds shall have the right to compel the exercise of the taxing power by the state or a municipality or the forfeiture of any of its property in connection with any default thereon. Every bond shall recite in substance that the principal of and interest on the bond is payable solely from the revenues pledged to its payment and that the municipality or the authority is not obligated to pay the principal or interest except from such revenues.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-49.
Issuance of negotiable notes.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized, whenever revenue bonds of the authority have been validated as provided in Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, to issue from time to time its negotiable notes in anticipation of the issuance of such bonds as validated and to renew from time to time any such notes by the issuance of new notes, regardless of whether the notes to be renewed have matured. The authority may issue notes only to provide funds which would otherwise be provided by the issuance of the bonds as validated. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed and delivered in the same manner as bonds.

Any resolution authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any resolution authorizing bonds of the authority or any issue thereof; and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds.

All notes shall be general obligations of the authority, payable out of any of its funds or revenues, subject only to any contractual rights of the holders of any of its notes or other obligations then outstanding, provided that there may be specially pledged to the payment of such notes the proceeds to be derived from the issuance of the validated bonds in anticipation of the issuance of which the notes have been issued.

Validation of such bonds shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of such notes, but it shall not be required that such notes be judicially validated.

Bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the par value of the bonds in anticipation of which they are to be issued.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-51.
Evidence of indebtedness to be considered negotiable instruments.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, every evidence of indebtedness issued under this chapter shall have all the rights and incidences of negotiable instruments, subject to provisions for registration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-53.
Refunding bonds.

A municipality or the authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the municipality or the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the municipality or the authority in respect to the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter which relate to the issuance of bonds, insofar as such provisions may be appropriate therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-55.
Exemption from taxation.

Bonds, their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any political subdivision or any agency of either thereof, excepting inheritance, estate or gift taxes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-57.
Dissolution of board of commissioners.

Whenever the board of commissioners of the authority and the utility commissions of its member municipalities shall by resolution or ordinance determine that the purposes for which the authority was formed have been substantially fulfilled and that all bonds theretofore issued and all other obligations theretofore incurred by the authority have been fully paid or satisfied, such board of commissioners and utility commissions may declare the authority to be dissolved. On the effective date of such resolution or ordinance, the title to all funds and other property owned by the authority at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the member municipalities of the authority as provided in this chapter and the bylaws of the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-59.
Annual reports; audits.

The authority shall, following the closing of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the governing authorities and to the utility commissions of its member municipalities. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering the operations of the authority during such year. The authority shall cause an audit of its books of record and accounts to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants and the cost thereof may be treated as a part of the cost of construction of a project or projects, or otherwise as part of the expense of administration of a project covered by such audit.

The municipalities possessing ownership interests in a project shall, following the closing of each fiscal year, submit a consolidated or combined annual report of their activities with respect to such project for the preceding year to the respective governing authorities of such municipalities. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering the operations of the jointly owned project during such year. The municipalities possessing ownership interests in a project shall cause an audit of the books of record and accounts relating to such project to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants and the cost thereof may be treated as a cost of construction of the project, or otherwise as part of the expenses of the administration of the project covered by such audit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-61.
Application of laws of other states.

Legislative consent is hereby given (a) to the application of the laws of other states with respect to taxation, payments in lieu of taxes, and the assessment thereof, to any municipality or the authority which has acquired or has an interest in a project, real or personal, situated without the state, or which owns or operates a project without the state pursuant to this chapter, and (b) to the application of regulatory and other laws of other states and of the United States to any municipality or authority which owns or operates a project without the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-63.
Grants and loans authorized.

The governing authorities of any municipality or the authority are hereby authorized to make application and to enter into contracts for and to accept grants-in-aid and loans from the federal and state governments and their agencies for planning, acquiring, constructing, expanding, maintaining and operating any project or facility, or participating in any research or development program, or performing any function which such municipality or the authority may be authorized by general or local law to provide or perform.

In order to exercise the authority granted by this section, the governing authorities of any municipality or the authority may:

Enter into and carry out contracts with the state or federal government or any agency or institution thereof under which such government, agency or institution grants financial or other assistance to the municipality or authority;

Accept such assistance or funds as may be granted or loaned by the state or federal government with or without such a contract;

Agree to and comply with any reasonable conditions which are imposed upon such grants or loans;

Make expenditures from any funds so granted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-65.
Powers and duties in connection with eminent domain, sales to customers of public utilities, and utility lines and rights-of-way.

Municipalities participating in a project of the authority shall possess the power of eminent domain for a project authorized by this chapter to the extent and in the same manner and under the same laws now available to municipalities under the laws of this state; provided, however, a municipality or the authority exercising the power of eminent domain for a project authorized by this chapter shall have no power to condemn any facilities or property owned by a public utility or gas association for the production, transmission or distribution of gas.

There shall be no transmission, sale, distribution or delivery of natural, artificial or mixed gas by the authority to any end user being served by a public utility as defined by Section 77-3-3(d)(ii) holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Mississippi Public Service Commission or to any end user located or to be located within the certificated area of such a public utility nor shall the powers of the authority be exercised for or on behalf of any such end user unless the public utility holding such a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall have filed with the Mississippi Public Service Commission a statement that it is either unwilling or unable to serve such user.

The lines and rights-of-way of any public utility or of gas associations or of municipalities participating in a project or of the authority may be crossed by any other municipalities participating in a project of the authority. The lines of any municipality participating in a project of the authority may be crossed by any public utility or gas association. Provided, however, the amount of damages, if any, resulting to the line or right-of-way from the crossing thereof as provided herein shall be determined by the affected parties and shall be paid by the public utility, gas association, municipality or municipalities participating in a project, or the authority, to the owner of the lines or rights-of-way crossed. When the parties affected cannot agree upon the damages to be paid for the crossing, either party may file with the circuit court of the county in which the crossing occurs a petition seeking a determination of the amount of the damages. Said action shall be tried by jury at the next regular term of said court in the same manner and under the same principles as provided for the determination of damages in eminent domain proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 33, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-67.
Where utility commission and municipality have same governing authorities.

Whenever the governing authorities of the utility commission and of any municipality are one and the same, separate actions required by this chapter by the governing authorities of the municipality with respect to an action or determination required by this chapter by the governing authorities of the municipality with respect to an action or determination required by this chapter of a utility commission, including the ratification of resolutions of said utility commission, shall not be necessary, but the action required of a utility commission by this chapter shall be deemed to have occurred when done by the body forming the governing authorities and the utility commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-69.
Provisions supplemental to other laws.

The foregoing sections of this chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative and complete method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other general, special or local law, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the issuance of bonds for the purpose of financing the ownership of any facilities or any interest therein by any private corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 35, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-71.
Provisions not subject to Public Service Commission law.

The rates, services and practices relating to the purchase, development, storage, transmission, distribution and sale by the authority of gas as authorized by this chapter shall not be subject to the provisions of the Mississippi Public Service Commission law nor to its regulation.

The provisions of this chapter do not, and are not intended to, increase or diminish the authority and jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission with respect to the distribution, sale, or transmission of gas by any county, municipal corporation or other political subdivision of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-73.
Provisions to be liberally construed.

In order to effectuate the purposes and policies prescribed in this chapter, the provisions hereof shall be liberally construed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 39, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-75.
Members of legislature to have no interest in bonds.

No member of the Legislature or elected official or any partner or associate of any member of the Legislature or elected official shall be interested or derive any income, either directly or indirectly, from the issuance of any bonds under this chapter during his or her term of office or within one (1) year after the expiration of such term of office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 40, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-77.
Temporary borrowing through revenue anticipation notes for current and necessary expenses.

The authority is hereby authorized to make temporary borrowings through revenue anticipation notes for the purpose of meeting the current and necessary expenses of the authority (including the purchase of gas supplies) and paying the costs of issuing the revenue anticipation notes. The authority is authorized to make such temporary borrowings through revenue anticipation notes for a period not to exceed thirteen (13) months. To provide for such temporary borrowings, the authority may provide for the private sale of such revenue anticipation notes and may enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreements or other agreements with any banks, trust companies or other lending institutions, investment banking firms or persons in the United States having power to enter into the same. The authority shall provide for repayment of any revenue anticipation note issued hereunder within thirteen (13) months from the issuance date thereof from all or a portion of any available revenues of the system.

All temporary borrowings made under this section shall be evidenced by revenue anticipation notes of the authority which shall be issued, from time to time, for such amounts, in such form and in such denominations and subject to terms and conditions of sale and issuance, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest and time of payment of interest as the board of commissioners shall authorize and direct in accordance with this section. Such authorization and direction may provide for the subsequent issuance of replacement notes to refund, upon issuance thereof, such notes, and may specify such other terms and conditions with respect to the notes or any replacement notes authorized for issuance as the board of commissioners of the authority may determine and direct. Revenue anticipation notes issued by the authority under the provisions of this section shall not be subject to any other requirements set forth in this chapter with respect to projects financed with bonds or the sale of issuance of bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 324, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2003).